Nebraska, session 109, LB63.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB63 LB63
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 9-1103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1103 For purposes of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act:
(1) Authorized gaming operator means a person or entity licensed
pursuant to the act to operate games of chance within a licensed
racetrack enclosure;
(2) Authorized gaming operator license means a license to operate
games of chance as an authorized gaming operator at a licensed racetrack
enclosure;
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of this
subdivision, authorized sporting event means a professional sporting
event, a collegiate sporting event, an international sporting event, a
professional motor race event, a professional sports draft, an individual
sports award, an electronic sport, or a simulated game; and
(b) Authorized sporting event does not include an instate collegiate
sporting event in which an instate collegiate or university team is a
participant, a parimutuel wager, a fantasy sports contest, a minor league
sporting event, a sporting event at the high school level or below
regardless of the age of any individual participant, or any sporting
event excluded by the commission;
(4) Collegiate sporting event means an athletic event or competition
of an intercollegiate sport played at the collegiate level for which
eligibility requirements for participation by a student athlete are
established by a national association for the promotion or regulation of
collegiate athletics;
(5) Commission means the State Racing and Gaming Commission;
(6) Designated sports wagering area means an area, as approved by
the commission, in which sports wagering is conducted;
(7) Game of chance means any game which has the elements of chance,
prize, and consideration, including any wager on a slot machine, table
game, counter game, or card game, a keno lottery conducted in accordance
-2-

LB63 LB63
2025 2025
with the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, or sports wagering. Game
of chance does not include any game the operation of which is prohibited
at a casino by federal law;
(8) Gaming device means an electronic, mechanical, or other device
which plays a game of chance when activated by a player using currency, a
token, or other item of value;
(9) International sporting event means an international team or
individual sporting event governed by an international sports federation
or sports governing body, including sporting events governed by the
International Olympic Committee and the International Federation of
Association Football;
(10) Licensed racetrack enclosure means all real property licensed
and utilized for the conduct of a race meeting, including the racetrack
and any grandstand, concession stand, office, barn, barn area, employee
housing facility, parking lot, and additional area designated by the
commission in accordance with the Constitution of Nebraska and applicable
Nebraska law;
(11) Limited gaming device means an electronic gaming device which
(a) offers games of chance, (b) does not dispense currency, tokens, or
other items of value, and (c) does not have a cash winnings hopper,
mechanical or simulated spinning reel, or side handle;
(12) Prohibited participant means any individual whose participation
may undermine the integrity of the wagering or the sporting event or any
person who is prohibited from sports wagering for other good cause shown
as determined by the commission, including, but not limited to: (a) Any
individual placing a wager as an agent or proxy; (b) any person who is an
athlete, a coach, a referee, or a player in any sporting event overseen
by the sports governing body of such person based on publicly available
information; (c) a person who holds a paid position of authority or
influence sufficient to exert influence over the participants in a
sporting event, including, but not limited to, any coach, manager,
-3-

LB63 LB63
2025 2025
handler, or athletic trainer, or a person with access to certain types of
exclusive information, on any sporting event overseen by the sports
governing body of such person based on publicly available information; or
(d) a person identified as prohibited from sports wagering by any list
provided by a sports governing body to the commission;
(13) Racing license means a license issued for a licensed racetrack
enclosure by the commission; and
(14) Sports wagering means the acceptance of wagers on an authorized
sporting event by any system of wagering as authorized by the commission.
Sports wagering does not include (a) placing a wager on the performance
or nonperformance of any individual athlete participating in a single
game or match of a collegiate sporting event in which a collegiate team
from this state is participating, (b) placing an in-game wager on any
game or match of a collegiate sporting event in which a collegiate team
from this state is participating, (c) placing a wager on the performance
or nonperformance of any individual athlete under eighteen years of age
participating in a professional or international sporting event, or (c)
(d) placing a wager on the performance of athletes in an individual
sporting event excluded by the commission.
Sec. 2. Original section 9-1103, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-